Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 3. Management of Condominium.
§ 55.1-1949.
Meetings of unit owners’ association and executive board.

Meetings of the unit owners’ association shall be held in accordance with the provisions of the condominium instruments at least once each year after the formation of the association. The bylaws shall specify an officer or his agent who shall, at least 21 days in advance of any annual or regularly scheduled meeting and at least seven days in advance of any other meeting, send to each unit owner notice of the time, place, and purposes of such meeting. In the event of cancellation of any annual meeting of the unit owners’ association at which directors are elected, the seven-day notice of any subsequent meeting scheduled to elect such directors shall include a statement that the meeting is scheduled for the purpose of the election of directors.
A. 1. Meetings of the unit owners’ association shall be held in accordance with the provisions of the condominium instruments at least once each year after the formation of the association. The bylaws shall specify an officer or his agent who shall, at least 21 days in advance of any annual or regularly scheduled meeting and at least seven days in advance of any other meeting, send to each unit owner notice of the time, place, and purposes of such meeting. In the event of cancellation of any annual meeting of the unit owners’ association at which directors are elected, the seven-day notice of any subsequent meeting scheduled to elect such directors shall include a statement that the meeting is scheduled for the purpose of the election of directors.

Notice shall be sent by United States mail to all unit owners of record at the address of their respective units, unless the unit owner has provided to such officer or his agent an address other than the address of the unit, or notice may be hand delivered by the officer or his agent, provided that the officer or his agent certifies in writing that notice was delivered to the person of the unit owner.

In lieu of delivering notice as specified in subdivision 2, such officer or his agent may send notice by electronic means if consented to by the unit owner to whom the notice is given, provided that the officer or his agent certifies in writing that notice was sent and, if such electronic mail was returned as undeliverable, notice was subsequently sent by United States mail.

Except as otherwise provided in the condominium instruments, the provisions of this subsection shall apply to executive board meetings at which business of the unit owners’ association is transacted or discussed. All meetings of the unit owners’ association or the executive board, including any subcommittee or other committee of such association or board, shall be open to all unit owners of record. The executive board shall not use work sessions or other informal gatherings of the executive board to circumvent the open meeting requirements of this section. Minutes of the meetings of the executive board shall be recorded and shall be available as provided in §

55.1-1945

.
B. 1. Except as otherwise provided in the condominium instruments, the provisions of this subsection shall apply to executive board meetings at which business of the unit owners’ association is transacted or discussed. All meetings of the unit owners’ association or the executive board, including any subcommittee or other committee of such association or board, shall be open to all unit owners of record. The executive board shall not use work sessions or other informal gatherings of the executive board to circumvent the open meeting requirements of this section. Minutes of the meetings of the executive board shall be recorded and shall be available as provided in §

55.1-1945

.

Notice of the time, date, and place of each meeting of the executive board or of any subcommittee or other committee of the executive board, and of each meeting of a subcommittee or other committee of the unit owners’ association, shall be published where it is reasonably calculated to be available to a majority of the unit owners.A unit owner may make a request to be notified on a continual basis of any such meetings, which request shall be made at least once a year in writing and include the unit owners’ name, address, zip code, and any email address as appropriate. Notice of the time, date, and place shall be sent to any unit owner requesting notice (i) by first-class mail or email in the case of meetings of the executive board or (ii) by email in the case of meetings of any subcommittee or other committee of the executive board or of a subcommittee or other committee of the unit owners’ association.Notice, reasonable under the circumstances, of special or emergency meetings shall be given contemporaneously with the notice provided to members of the (i) executive board or any subcommittee or other committee of such board or (ii) subcommittee or other committee of the unit owners’ association conducting the meeting.

Unless otherwise exempt as relating to an executive session pursuant to subsection C, at least one copy of all agenda packets and materials furnished to members of the executive board or subcommittee or other committee of the executive board for a meeting shall be made available for inspection by the membership of the unit owners’ association at the same time such documents are furnished to the members of the executive board.

Any unit owner may record any portion of a meeting required to be open. The executive board or subcommittee or other committee of the executive board conducting the meeting may adopt rules (i) governing the placement and use of equipment necessary for recording a meeting to prevent interference with the proceedings and (ii) requiring the unit owner recording the meeting to provide notice that the meeting is being recorded.

Voting by secret or written ballot in an open meeting is a violation of this chapter except for the election of officers.

The executive board or any subcommittee or other committee of the executive board may convene in executive session to consider personnel matters; consult with legal counsel; discuss and consider contracts, probable or pending litigation, and matters involving violations of the condominium instruments or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to such condominium instruments for which a unit owner, his family members, tenants, guests, or other invitees are responsible; or discuss and consider the personal liability of unit owners to the unit owners’ association, upon the affirmative vote in an open meeting to assemble in executive session. The motion shall state specifically the purpose for the executive session. Reference to the motion and the stated purpose for the executive session shall be included in the minutes. The executive board shall restrict the consideration of matters during such portions of meetings to only those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion. No contract, motion, or other action adopted, passed, or agreed to in executive session shall become effective unless the executive board or subcommittee or other committee of the executive board, following the executive session, reconvenes in open meeting and takes a vote on such contract, motion, or other action, which shall have its substance reasonably identified in the open meeting. The requirements of this section do not require the disclosure of information in violation of law.

Subject to reasonable rules adopted by the executive board, the executive board shall provide a designated period during each meeting to allow unit owners an opportunity to comment on any matter relating to the unit owners’ association. During a meeting at which the agenda is limited to specific topics or at a special meeting, the executive board may limit the comments of unit owners to the topics listed on the meeting agenda.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.75; 1978, c. 363; 1989, c. 58; 1990, c. 662; 1992, c. 72; 2000, c. 906; 2001, c. 715; 2003, cc. 404, 405, 442; 2005, c. 353; 2007, c. 675; 2013, c. 275; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9, 494.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9 and 494, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subdivision A 3, deleted “to the extent that the condominium instruments or the condominium’s rules and regulations expressly provide” following “such officer or his agent may” and added “and, if such electronic mail was returned as undeliverable, notice was subsequently sent by United States mail” at the end; in subdivision B 1, deleted the former fourth sentence, which read “The unit owners’ association may, to the extent that the condominium instruments or adopted rules expressly provide, send notice by electronic means if consented to by the officer to whom the notice is given”; in subdivision B 4, deleted the former second paragraph, which read “If a meeting of the executive board is conducted by telephone conference or video conference or similar electronic means, at least two board members shall be physically present at the meeting place included in the notice. The audio equipment shall be sufficient for any member in attendance to hear what is said by any board member participating in the meeting who is not physically present”; and in subsection D, substituted “period during each meeting” for “period of time during a meeting” in the first sentence.

§ 55.1-1950.
Distribution of information by members.

The executive board shall establish a reasonable, effective, and free method, appropriate to the size and nature of the condominium, for unit owners to communicate among themselves and with the executive board regarding any matter concerning the unit owners’ association.

Except as otherwise provided in the condominium instruments, the executive board shall not require prior approval of the dissemination or content of any material regarding any matter concerning the unit owners’ association.

History.

2001, c. 715, § 55-79.75:1; 2003, c. 405; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1951.
Display of the flag of the United States; necessary supporting structures; affirmative defense.

In accordance with the federal Freedom to Display the American Flag Act of 2005 (P.L. 109-243), no unit owners’ association shall prohibit or otherwise adopt or enforce any policy restricting a unit owner from displaying upon property to which the unit owner has a separate ownership interest or a right to exclusive possession or use the flag of the United States whenever such display is in compliance with Chapter 1 of Title 4 of the United States Code (4 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.) or any rule or custom pertaining to the proper display of the flag. A unit owners’ association may, however, establish reasonable restrictions as to the size, place, duration, and manner of placement or display of the flag on such property, provided that such restrictions are necessary to protect a substantial interest of the unit owners’ association.

The unit owners’ association may restrict the display of such flags in the common elements.

In any action brought by the unit owners’ association under §

55.1-1959

for a violation of a flag restriction, the unit owners’ association shall bear the burden of proof that the restrictions as to the size, place, duration, and manner of placement or display of such flag are necessary to protect a substantial interest of the unit owners’ association.

In any action brought by the unit owners’ association under §

55.1-1959

, the unit owner shall be entitled to assert as an affirmative defense that the required disclosure of any limitation pertaining to the flag of the United States or any flagpole or similar structure necessary to display the flag of the United States was not contained in the public offering statement or resale certificate, as appropriate, required pursuant to §

55.1-1976

or

55.1-1991

.

History.

2007, cc. 854, 910, § 55-79.75:2; 2010, cc. 166, 453; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article on real estate law covering judicial opinions from 2006 to 2008, and the 2007 and 2008 sessions of the Virginia General Assembly, see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 379 (2008).

§ 55.1-1951.1.
Installation of solar energy collection devices.

As used in this section, “solar energy collection device” means any device manufactured and sold for the sole purpose of facilitating the collection and beneficial use of solar energy, including passive heating panels or building components and solar photovoltaic apparatus.

No unit owners’ association shall prohibit an owner from installing a solar energy collection device on that owner’s property unless the recorded declaration for the unit owners’ association establishes such a prohibition. However, a unit owners’ association may establish reasonable restrictions concerning the size, place, and manner of placement of such solar energy collection devices on property designated and intended for individual ownership and use. Any resale certificate pursuant to §

55.1-1990

given to a purchaser shall contain a statement setting forth any restriction, limitation, or prohibition on the right of an owner to install or use solar energy collection devices on his property.

A restriction shall be deemed not to be reasonable if application of the restriction to a particular proposal (i) increases the cost of installation of the solar energy collection device by five percent over the projected cost of the initially proposed installation or (ii) reduces the energy production by the solar energy collection device by 10 percent below the projected energy production of the initially proposed installation. The owner shall provide documentation prepared by an independent solar panel design specialist, who is certified by the North American Board of Certified Energy Practitioners and is licensed in Virginia, that is satisfactory to the unit owners’ association to show that the restriction is not reasonable according to the criteria established in this subsection.

The unit owners’ association may prohibit or restrict the installation of solar energy collection devices on the common elements or common area within the real estate development served by the unit owners’ association. A unit owners’ association may establish reasonable restrictions as to the number, size, place, and manner of placement or installation of any solar energy collection device installed on the common elements or common area.

History.

2006, c. 939, §§ 67-700, 67-701; 2008, c. 881; 2009, c. 866; 2013, c. 357; 2014, c. 525; 2020, cc. 272, 795; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 67-700 and 67-701 were rewritten as one section and recodified by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, effective October 1, 2021. The section was placed in the Property Owners’ Association Act
(as §

55.1-1820.1

), the Virginia Condominium Act (this section), and the Virginia Real Estate Cooperative Act (§

55.1-2133.1

).

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Solar panels. —

Under § 67-701 as amended, effective July 1, 2014, a property owners’ association may prohibit solar panels on private property only through a recorded declaration but not through any other means. Other than as may be contained in recorded declarations, such prohibitions are unenforceable, regardless of when or how they were imposed.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Joseph R. Yost, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, No. 14-057,
(4/14/15).

A property owners’ association retains the authority under § 67-701 to establish reasonable restrictions concerning the size, location, and manner of placement of solar panels on private property, either through a recorded declaration or by any other legal means.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Joseph R. Yost, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, No. 14-057,
(4/14/15).

§ 55.1-1952.
Meetings of unit owners’ association and executive board; quorums.

Unless the condominium instruments otherwise provide or as specified in subsection H of §

55.1-1953

, a quorum shall be deemed to be present throughout any meeting of the unit owners’ association until adjourned if persons entitled to cast more than one-third of the votes are present at the beginning of such meeting. The bylaws may provide for a larger percentage, or for a smaller percentage not less than 10 percent.

Unless the condominium instruments specify a larger majority, a quorum shall be deemed to be present throughout any meeting of the executive board if persons entitled to cast one-half of the votes in that body are present at the beginning of such meeting.

On petition of the unit owners’ association or any unit owner entitled to vote, the circuit court of the county or city in which the condominium or the greater part of such condominium is located may order an annual meeting of the unit owners’ association be held for the purpose of the election of members of the executive board, provided that:

No annual meeting as required by §

55.1-1949

has been held due to the failure to obtain a quorum of unit owners as specified in the condominium instruments; and

The unit owners’ association has made good faith attempts to convene a duly called annual meeting of the unit owners’ association in three successive years, which attempts have proven unsuccessful due to the failure to obtain a quorum.

The court may set the quorum for the meeting and enter other orders necessary to convene the meeting.

A unit owner filing a petition under this subsection shall provide a copy of the petition to the executive board at least 10 business days prior to filing.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.76; 2003, c. 413; 2015, cc. 214, 430; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9, 494.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9 and 494, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “subsection H” for “subsection G” in subsection A.

§ 55.1-1953.
Meetings of unit owners’ association and executive board; voting by unit owners; proxies.

The bylaws may allocate to each unit depicted on plats and plans that comply with subsections A and B of §

55.1-1920

a number of votes in the unit owners’ association proportionate to the undivided interest in the common elements appertaining to each such unit.

Otherwise, the bylaws shall allocate to each such unit an equal number of votes in the unit owners’ association, subject to the following exception: Each convertible space so depicted shall be allocated a number of votes in the unit owners’ association proportionate to the size of each such space, vis-a-vis the aggregate size of all units so depicted, while the remaining votes in the unit owners’ association shall be allocated equally to the other units so depicted.

Since a unit owner may be more than one person, if only one of such persons is present at a meeting of the unit owners’ association, that person shall be entitled to cast the votes appertaining to that unit. If more than one of such persons is present, the vote appertaining to that unit shall be cast only in accordance with their unanimous agreement unless the condominium instruments expressly provide otherwise, and such consent shall be conclusively presumed if any one of them purports to cast the votes appertaining to that unit without protest being made forthwith by any of the others to the person presiding over the meeting. For purposes of this subsection, “person” is deemed to include any natural person having authority to execute deeds on behalf of any person, excluding natural persons, that is, either alone or in conjunction with another person, a unit owner.

The votes appertaining to any unit may be cast pursuant to a proxy duly executed by or on behalf of the unit owner, or, in cases where the unit owner is more than one person, by or on behalf of all such unit owners. No such proxy shall be revocable except by actual notice to the person presiding over the meeting, by the unit owner or by any of such persons, that it be revoked. Except to the extent otherwise provided in the condominium instruments, any proxy is void if it is not dated, or if it purports to be revocable without the required notice. Any proxy shall be void if not signed by or on behalf of the unit owner. If the unit owner is more than one person, any such unit owner may object to the proxy at or prior to the meeting, whereupon the proxy shall be deemed revoked. Any proxy shall terminate after the first meeting held on or after the date of that proxy or any recess or adjournment of that meeting. The proxy shall include a brief explanation of the effect of leaving the proxy uninstructed.

Unless expressly prohibited by the condominium instruments, a unit owner may vote at a meeting of the unit owners’ association in person, by proxy, or by absentee ballot. Such voting may take place by electronic means, provided that the executive board has adopted guidelines for such voting by electronic means. Unit owners voting by absentee ballot or proxy shall be deemed to be present at the meeting for all purposes.

If 50 percent or more of the votes in the unit owners’ association appertain to 25 percent or less of the units, then in any case where a majority vote is required by the condominium instruments or by this chapter, the requirement for such a majority shall be deemed to include, in addition to the specified majority of the votes, assent by the unit owners of a like majority of the units.

All votes appertaining to units owned by the unit owners’ association shall be deemed present for quorum purposes at all duly called meetings of the unit owners’ association and shall be deemed cast in the same proportions as the votes cast by unit owners other than the unit owners’ association.

Except to the extent that the condominium instruments provide otherwise, the voting interest allocated to the unit or member that has been suspended by the unit owners’ association or the executive board pursuant to the condominium instruments shall not be counted in the total number of voting interests used to determine the quorum for any meeting or vote under the condominium instruments.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.77; 1980, c. 108; 1991, c. 497; 1993, c. 667; 1998, c. 32; 2003, c. 442; 2015, c. 214; 2019, cc. 367, 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9, 494.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 367 amended § 55-79.77 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in this section, in subsection D, by substituting “unit owners” for “persons” at the end of the first sentence and “Any proxy shall be void if not signed by or on behalf of the unit owner. If the unit owner is more than one person, any such unit owner may object to the proxy at or prior to the meeting, whereupon the proxy shall be deemed revoked” for “A proxy is void if not signed by a person having authority, at the time of execution, to execute deeds on behalf of that person.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9 and 494, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted the former last sentence of subsection D, which read “To the extent the condominium instruments or the condominium’s rules and regulations expressly so provide, a vote or proxy may be submitted by electronic means, provided that any such electronic means shall either set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the electronic means was authorized by the unit owner or the unit owner’s proxy”; added subsection E and redesignated remaining subsections.

§ 55.1-1954.
Officers.

If the condominium instruments provide that any officer must be a unit owner, then any such officer who disposes of all of his units in fee shall be deemed to have disqualified himself from continuing in office unless the condominium instruments otherwise provide, or unless he acquires or contracts to acquire another unit in the condominium under terms giving him a right of occupancy effective on or before the termination of his right of occupancy under such disposition.

If the condominium instruments provide that any officer must be a unit owner, then notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 1 of §

55.1-1912

, the term “unit owner” in such context shall, unless the condominium instruments otherwise provide, be deemed to include any director, officer, partner in, or trustee of any person that is, either alone or in conjunction with another person, a unit owner. Any officer who would not be eligible to serve as such were he not a director, officer, partner in, or trustee of such a person, shall be deemed to have disqualified himself from continuing in office if he ceases to have any such affiliation with that person, or if that person would itself have been deemed to have disqualified itself from continuing in such office under subsection A were it a natural person holding such office.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.78; 1991, c. 497; 2002, c. 520; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinion cited below refers to prior law.

Eligibility for membership in owners’ association board of directors. —

The mere leasing of a unit, for a period of less than 20 years, does not meet the definition of the term “dispose” and, therefore, does not disqualify a unit owner who becomes a nonresident from membership eligibility on the association’s board of directors. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable L. Karen Darner, Member, House of Delegates, 2001 Va. AG LEXIS 74 01-064 (7/30/01).

§ 55.1-1955.
Upkeep of condominiums; warranty against structural defects; statute of limitations for warranty; warranty review committee.

Except to the extent otherwise provided by the condominium instruments, all powers and responsibilities, including financial responsibility, with regard to maintenance, repair, renovation, restoration, and replacement of the condominium shall belong (i) to the unit owners’ association in the case of the common elements and (ii) to the individual unit owner in the case of any unit or any part of such unit, except to the extent that the need for repairs, renovation, restoration, or replacement arises from a condition originating in or through the common elements or any apparatus located within the common elements, in which case the unit owners’ association shall have such powers and responsibilities. Each unit owner shall afford to the other unit owners and to the unit owners’ association and to any agents or employees of either such access through his unit as may be reasonably necessary to enable them to exercise and discharge their respective powers and responsibilities. To the extent that damage is inflicted on the common elements or any unit through which access is taken, the unit owner causing the same, or the unit owners’ association if it caused the damage, shall be liable for the prompt repair of such damage.

Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the declarant shall warrant or guarantee against structural defects each of the units for two years from the date each is conveyed and all of the common elements for two years. For each unit, the declarant shall also warrant that the unit is fit for habitation in the case of a residential unit and constructed in a workmanlike manner so as to pass without objection in the trade. The two-year warranty as to each of the common elements begins whenever that common element has been completed or, if later, (i) as to any common element within any additional land or portion of the additional land, at the time the first unit in that additional land is conveyed; (ii) as to any common element within any convertible land or portion of the convertible land, at the time the first unit in the convertible land is conveyed; and (iii) as to any common element within any other portion of the condominium, at the time the first unit in that portion is conveyed. For the purposes of this subsection, no unit shall be deemed conveyed unless conveyed to a bona fide purchaser. Any conveyance of a condominium unit transfers to the purchaser all of the declarant’s warranties against structural defects imposed by this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, structural defects shall be those defects in components constituting any unit or common element that reduce the stability or safety of the structure below accepted standards or restrict the normal intended use of all or part of the structure and that require repair, renovation, restoration, or replacement. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to make the declarant responsible for any items of maintenance relating to the units or common elements.

An action for breach of any warranty prescribed by this section shall begin within (i) five years after the date such warranty period began or (ii) one year after the formation of any warranty review committee pursuant to subsection B of §

55.1-1943

, whichever occurs last. However, no such action shall be maintained against the declarant unless a written statement by the claimant, or his agent, attorney, or representative, of the nature of the alleged defect has been sent to the declarant by registered or certified mail at his last known address, as reflected in the records of the Common Interest Community Board, more than six months prior to the beginning of the action giving the declarant an opportunity to cure the alleged defect within a reasonable time, not to exceed five months. Sending the notice required by this subsection shall toll the statute of limitations for beginning a breach of warranty action for a period not to exceed six months.

If the initial period of declarant control has been extended in accordance with subsection B of §

55.1-1943

, the warranty review committee, referred to in this section as “the committee,” shall have (i) subject to the provisions of subdivision 3, the irrevocable power as attorney-in-fact on behalf of the unit owners’ association to assert or settle in the name of the unit owners’ association any claims involving the declarant’s warranty against structural defects with respect to all of the common elements and (ii) the authority to levy an additional assessment against all of the units in proportion to their respective undivided interests in the common elements pursuant to §

55.1-1964

if the committee determines that the assessments levied by the unit owners’ association are insufficient to enable the committee reasonably to perform its functions pursuant to this subsection. The committee or the declarant shall notify the governing body of the locality in which the condominium is located of the formation of the committee within 30 days of its formation. Within 30 days after such notice, the local governing body or an agency designated by the local governing body shall advise the chair of the committee of any outstanding violations of applicable building codes, local ordinances, or other deficiencies of record. Members of the committee shall be insured, indemnified, and subject to liability to the same extent as officers or directors under the condominium instruments or applicable law. The unit owners’ association shall provide sufficient funds reasonably necessary for the committee to perform the functions set out in this subsection and to:

Engage an independent architect, engineer, legal counsel, and such other experts as the committee may reasonably determine;

Investigate whether there exists any breach of the warranty as to any of the common elements. The committee shall document its findings and the evidence that supports such findings. Such findings and evidence shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed to the declarant without the consent of the committee; and

Assert or settle in the name of the unit owners’ association any claims involving the declarant’s warranty on the common elements, provided that (i) the committee sends the declarant at least six months prior to the expiration of the statute of limitations a written statement pursuant to subsection C of the alleged nature of any defect in the common elements giving the declarant an opportunity to cure the alleged defect; (ii) the declarant fails to cure the alleged defect within a reasonable time; and (iii) the declarant control period or the statute of limitations has not expired.

Within 45 days after the formation of the committee, the declarant shall deliver to the chair of the committee (i) a copy of the latest available approved plans and specifications for all improvements in the project or as-built plans if available; (ii) all association insurance policies that are currently in force; (iii) any written unexpired warranties of the contractors, subcontractors, suppliers, and manufacturers applicable to the condominium; and (iv) a list of manufacturers of paints, roofing materials, and other similar materials if specified for use on the condominium property.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.79; 1975, c. 415; 1980, c. 386; 1982, c. 545; 1984, c. 347; 1987, c. 395; 2006, c. 646; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2013, c. 599; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 599, cl. 2 provides: “That for any condominium existing on July 1, 2013, the condominium instruments for such condominium may be amended in the manner prescribed in the relevant condominium instruments or by statute to conform to the provisions of this act.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Real Estate Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 257 (2006).

§ 55.1-1956.
Control of common elements.

Except to the extent prohibited, restricted, or limited by the condominium instruments, the unit owners’ association shall have the power to:

Employ, dismiss, and replace agents and employees to exercise and discharge the powers and responsibilities of the association arising under §

55.1-1955

;

Make or cause to be made additional improvements on and as a part of the common elements;

Grant or withhold approval of any action by one or more unit owners or other persons entitled to the occupancy of any unit that would change the exterior appearance of any unit or of any other portion of the condominium, or elect or provide for the appointment of an architectural control committee, the members of which must have the same qualifications as officers, to grant or withhold such approval; and

Acquire, hold, convey, and encumber title to real property, including condominium units, whether or not the association is incorporated.

Except to the extent prohibited, restricted, or limited by the condominium instruments, the executive board of the unit owners’ association, if any, and if not, then the unit owners’ association itself, has the irrevocable power as attorney-in-fact on behalf of all the unit owners and their successors in title with respect to the common elements, including the right, in the name of the unit owners’ association, to (i) grant easements through the common elements and accept easements benefiting all or any portion of the condominium; (ii) assert, through litigation or otherwise, defend against, compromise, adjust, and settle any claims or actions related to common elements, other than claims against or actions involving the declarant during any period of declarant control reserved pursuant to subsection A of §

55.1-1943

; and (iii) apply for any governmental approvals under state and local law.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the grant by the condominium instruments of other powers and responsibilities to the unit owners’ association or its executive board.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.80; 1975, c. 415; 1981, c. 146; 1982, c. 195; 1991, c. 497; 1993, c. 667; 1996, c. 977; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “Special Problems Related to Condominium Construction Litigation,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 405 (1985).

For survey article on judicial decisions in real estate law from June 1, 2002 through June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2003).

§ 55.1-1957.
Common elements; notice of pesticide application.

The unit owners’ association shall post notice of all pesticide applications in or upon the common elements. Such notice shall consist of conspicuous signs placed in or upon the common elements where the pesticide will be applied at least 48 hours prior to the application.

History.

1999, c. 65, § 55-79.80:01; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.